North Dakota, session 69, SB2016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to
job service North Dakota for the purpose of defraying the expenses of job service North Dakota, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $34,722,502 $2,765,451 $37,487,953
New and vacant FTE pool 0 1,614,189 1,614,189
Operating expenses 22,290,155 (1,261,892) 21,028,263
Capital assets 20,000 0 20,000
Grants 8,054,512 0 8,054,512
Reed Act - unemployment insurance 10,915,000 0 10,915,000
computer modernization
Total all funds $76,002,169 $3,117,748 $79,119,917
Less other funds 69,268,250 (798,726) 68,469,524
Total general fund $6,733,919 $3,916,474 $10,650,393
Full-time equivalent positions 158.61 1.00 159.61
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Salaries funding source change $2,100,000 ($2,100,000) $0
Total $2,100,000 ($2,100,000) $0
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. Job service
North Dakota may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in section 1
of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the new and
vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the guidelines and
reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative
assembly.
SECTION 4. ADDITIONAL INCOME - APPROPRIATION. All federal funds received by job service
North Dakota in excess of those funds appropriated in section 1 of this Act are appropriated to
job service North Dakota for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. OTHER FUNDS - REED ACT FUNDS - UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
COMPUTER MODERNIZATION. The other funds appropriation in section 1 of this Act includes the sum
of $10,915,000 from federal Reed Act funds made available to the state by the federal Reed Act
distributions made in federal fiscal years 1957, 1958, 1999, and 2002, pursuant to section 903 of the

S. B. NO. 2016 - PAGE 2
federal Social Security Act. This sum, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, is for the purpose of
developing a modernization unemployment insurance computer system.
SECTION 6. EXEMPTION - UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE MODERNIZATION PROJECT -
FEDERAL STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND. The amount of $45,000,000 from federal funds derived
from the state fiscal recovery fund for the unemployment insurance modernization project in section 1 of
chapter 16 of the 2023 Session Laws is not subject to section 54-44.1-11, and any unexpended funds
from this appropriation may be continued and used during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2016 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2016.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 84 Nays 7 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State